Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1946.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3215(a) and (b) of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3215. Well location restrictions.(a) General rule.--Wells may not be drilled within 200 feet, or, in the case of an unconventional gas well, [500] 2,500 feet, measured horizontally from the [vertical well bore] perimeter of the well pad to a building or water well, existing when the copy of the plat is mailed as required by section 3211(b) (relating to well permits) without written consent of the owner of the building or water well. Unconventional gas wells may not be drilled within [1,000] 2,500 feet measured horizontally from the 1234567891011121314151617 [vertical well bore] perimeter of the well pad to any existing water well, surface water intake, reservoir or other water supply extraction point used by a water purveyor [without the written consent of the water purveyor. If consent is not obtained and]. If the distance restriction would deprive the owner of the oil and gas rights of the right to produce or share in the oil or gas underlying the surface tract, the well operator [shall be granted] may submit a request for a variance from the distance restriction [upon submission of]. As part of the variance request, the well operator shall submit a plan identifying the additional measures, facilities or practices as prescribed by the department to be employed during well site construction, drilling and operations. [The variance] If the department is satisfied that the plan adequately addresses these additional measures, facilities or practices, the variance shall be granted and shall include additional terms and conditions required by the department to ensure safety and protection of affected persons and property, including insurance, bonding, indemnification and technical requirements. Notwithstanding section 3211(e), if a variance request has been submitted, the department may extend its permit review period for up to 15 days upon notification to the applicant of the reasons for the extension.(b) Limitation.--(1) No well site may be prepared or well drilled within 100 feet or, in the case of an unconventional well, [300] 750 feet from the [vertical well bore or 100 feet from the edge of the well site, whichever is greater,] perimeter of the well pad, measured horizontally from any solid blue lined stream, spring or body of water as identified on the most 20250HB1946PN2455 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 current 7 1/2 minute topographic quadrangle map of the United States Geological Survey.(2) The edge of the disturbed area associated with any unconventional well site must maintain a [100-foot] 750-foot setback from the edge of any solid blue lined stream, spring or body of water as identified on the most current 7 1/2 minute topographic quadrangle map of the United States Geological Survey.(3) No unconventional well may be drilled within [300] 750 feet of any wetlands greater than one acre in size, and the edge of the disturbed area of any well site must maintain a [100-foot] 750-foot setback from the boundary of the wetlands.(3.1) Except as provided under paragraph (3.2), no unconventional well or related unconventional drilling infrastructure shall be located within 2,500 feet of a building, water well or water supply.(3.2) No unconventional well or related unconventional drilling infrastructure shall be located within 5,000 feet of a school, hospital, long-term care facility, child-care facility or facility that houses or serves individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.(4) The department [shall] may not waive the distance restrictions [upon submission of a plan identifying additional measures, facilities or practices to be employed during well site construction, drilling and operations necessary to protect the waters of this Commonwealth. The waiver, if granted, shall include additional terms and conditions required by the department necessary to protect the waters of this Commonwealth. Notwithstanding section 20250HB1946PN2455 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 3211(e), if a waiver request has been submitted, the department may extend its permit review period for up to 15 days upon notification to the applicant of the reasons for the extension].* * *(h) Definition.--For purposes of this section, the term "related unconventional drilling infrastructure" shall include any of the following:(1) A compressor station.(2) A pit or impoundment containing drilling cuttings, flowback water, produced water or hazardous materials, chemicals or waste.(3) A tank containing hazardous materials, chemicals, condensate, waste, flowback or produced water.(4) Any equipment or structure used for the storage or handling of water, chemicals, fuels, hazardous materials or solid waste on a well site.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1946PN2455 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718